Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Model Procurement Code
45A.380.
Noncompetitive negotiation.

A local public agency may contract or purchase through noncompetitive negotiation only when a written determination is made that competition is not feasible and it is further determined in writing by a designee of the local public agency that:

An emergency exists which will cause public harm as a result of the delay in competitive procedures;

There is a single source within a reasonable geographical area of the product or service to be procured;

The contract is for the services of a licensed professional, such as attorney, physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, certified public accountant, registered nurse, or educational specialist; a technician such as a plumber, electrician, carpenter, or mechanic; or an artist such as a sculptor, aesthetic painter, or musician, provided, however, that this provision shall not apply to architects or engineers providing construction management services rather than professional architect or engineer services;

The contract is for the purchase of perishable foods, such as meat, fish, poultry, egg products, fresh vegetables, and fresh fruits;

The contract is for replacement parts where the need cannot be reasonably anticipated and stockpiling is not feasible;

The contract is for proprietary items for resale;

In school districts the contract relates to an enterprise in which the buying or selling by students is a part of the educational experience;

The contract or purchase is for expenditures made on authorized trips outside of the boundaries of the local public agency;

The contract is for the purchase of supplies which are sold at public auction or by receiving sealed bids;

The contract is for group life insurance, group health and accident insurance, group professional liability insurance, worker’s compensation insurance, and unemployment insurance;

The contract is for a sale of supplies at reduced prices that will afford a purchase at savings to the local public agency; or

The contract is with a private real estate developer and contains a requirement:

That the developer increase the size or otherwise improve the collection capacity of the sanitary sewer or storm water pipe serving the affected private real estate development; and

That the local public agency pay only the proportional cost of increasing the size, or otherwise improving the collection capacity, of the sanitary sewer or storm water pipe over the original collection capacity.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 77, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 12, effective April 9, 1980; 2017 ch. 151, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The position of constructing manager over a construction project does not constitute professional services exemption from competitive bidding under subsection (1)(c) (now subdivision (3)) of this section.

OAG 79-501

.

Where a small town water company cannot accurately predict the amount of chemicals it will need, has limited storage space to store chemicals that deteriorate somewhat in storage and that are somewhat unstable in nature, and has a history of purchasing chemicals in small quantities, indicating that such a practice was not just recently instituted to avoid the requirements of the Model Procurement Code, each purchase of these types of chemicals is a legally and factually separate transaction which, if under $2,500, is not subject to the bidding requirements of the Model Procurement Code and may be handled as a small purchase if small purchase procedures have been adopted pursuant to KRS

45A.385

.

OAG 80-125

.

Computer billing services may be procured by a county clerk for preparing tax bills by applying the noncompetitive negotiation provisions of subdivision (1) of this section, if the county clerk makes a written determination that competition is not feasible, and that an emergency exists which will cause public harm as a result of the delay in competitive procedures, and the fiscal court enters an order confirming the county clerk’s written determinations.

OAG 80-299

.

If a county has adopted the Model Procurement Code, the fiscal court may procure a private accounting or C.P.A. firm to audit the county’s funds (involving county budget and treasury) by way of noncompetitive negotiation.

OAG 80-624

.

If the fiscal court reasonably determines that competition in property insurance is not feasible, then the fiscal court may procure the property insurance by noncompetitive negotiation under this section.

OAG 81-109

.

Where a county fiscal court advertised for sealed bids for treated bridge lumber, but received only one nonresponsive bid, and the fiscal court then entered an order authorizing the county to purchase such lumber by noncompetitive negotiations, but no written determination was made that competition was not feasible or that any one of the other conditions described in this section was prevalent, there was nothing to indicate an emergency existed or that there was only a single source for bridge lumber and posts and none of the other conditions set out in subsections (1) through (11) of this section would seem to be even remotely applicable, the situation relative to the bridge lumber and posts was not subject to being handled by noncompetitive negotiation.

OAG 82-65

.

If a school district has chosen to operate under the Model Procurement Code, competitive bidding for general liability insurance on buildings and vehicles, etc., is required absent a legitimate, written determination by the local public agency to the contrary; this conclusion is based on the fact that in KRS 45A.345(23) the term “supplies” is defined to include insurance and that subdivision (10) of this section authorizes an exemption from competitive bidding by written determination if the “contract is for group life insurance, group health and accident insurance, group professional liability insurance, workers’ compensation insurance, and unemployment insurance,” an exemption which does not include general liability insurance.

OAG 82-170

.

Insofar as the Model Procurement Code is concerned, this section specifically lists those contracts that are professional in nature and excepted from competitive bidding, and the exception does not include insurance contracts with the exception of those contracts for group life insurance, group health and accident insurance, group professional liability insurance, workers’ compensation insurance and unemployment insurance.

OAG 82-337

.

Under KRS

424.260

a cafeteria plan of insurance coverage for school teachers need not be bid; under the Model Procurement Code the contract may be noncompetitively negotiated.

OAG 83-151

.

The Model Procurement Code allows local public agencies to be flexible in order to take advantage of discounts or cost savings available by means of noncompetitive negotiations if competitive negotiations would not yield greater savings in a given circumstance.

OAG 90-75

.

The requirements of this section concerning “noncompetitive negotiation,” as that term is defined by KRS 45A.345(12), allows a local public agency to enter into contracts by noncompetitive negotiations and without bidding, if it simply makes a written determination that competitive negotiation is not feasible and the contract is for a sale of supplies at reduced prices that will afford a purchase at savings to the local public agency.

OAG 90-75

.

A local public agency that has not adopted the Model Procurement Code is not required to follow competitive bidding procedures for insurance, and may contract with an insurance broker to solicit and receive bids for insurance, although competitive bidding remains preferred. A local public agency that has adopted the Model Procurement Code must follow all applicable provisions in seeking contracts with insurance brokers.

OAG 13-006

.

45A.385.
Small purchases by local public agencies.

The local public agency may use small purchase procedures for any contract for which a determination is made that the aggregate amount of the contract does not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) if small purchase procedures are in writing and available to the public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 78, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 13, effective April 9, 1980; 1984, ch. 6, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 95, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 192, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2019 ch. 79, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section and KRS

424.260

as amended in 1978 are pari materia and both are to be given effect by construing the $2,500 limitation to be an oversight by the Legislature that it was increasing the limitation of KRS

424.260

to $5,000 (since amended to $20,000).

OAG 78-357

.

The provisions of this section must govern over KRS

424.260

, as amended since the procurement code is a detailed, comprehensive and specific kind of legislation as contrasted with the short, skeletal and general legal notices law, KRS

424.260

.

OAG 79-429

;

OAG 79-447

.

The provision in KRS

80.130

, requiring bids for the construction of a low-cost housing project exceeding $2,000, has, in effect, been repealed by the provisions of this section relating to small purchases.

OAG 80-21

.

There is no prohibition against any particular vendor entering into one or more small purchase contracts with a local public agency, assuming that all statutory requirements are satisfied, including the provision that the items and services normally supplied as a unit are not artificially divided just for the purpose of utilizing the small purchase procedures.

OAG 80-21

.

Where a small town water company cannot accurately predict the amount of chemicals it will need, has limited storage space to store chemicals that deteriorate somewhat in storage and that are somewhat unstable in nature, and has a history of purchasing chemicals in small quantities, indicating that such a practice was not just recently instituted to avoid the requirements of the Model Procurement Code, each purchase of these types of chemicals is a legally and factually separate transaction which, if under $2,500 (now $20,000), is not subject to the bidding requirements of the Model Procurement Code and may be handled as a small purchase if small purchase procedures have been adopted pursuant to this section.

OAG 80-125

.

A county hospital commission may adopt regulations pursuant to KRS

45A.360

, and establish small purchase procedures pursuant to this section, but, since the fiscal court cannot delegate its overall fiscal control of the county hospital, such regulations and procedures would be subject to fiscal court approval.

OAG 80-128

.

Since a county hospital commission is not an autonomous unit of government and is subject to the direct and overall fiscal and financial supervision of the fiscal court, proper regulations and small purchase procedures adopted by fiscal court for the general county operations could be made applicable to the county hospital, and in that way duplication of effort could be avoided and the county would be on a unified system.

OAG 80-128

.

Any fiscal court adopting KRS

45A.345

through

45A.460

may, under this section, effect purchases not exceeding $5,000 (now $20,000) without formal bidding procedures, while those fiscal courts, under current law, which have not adopted such sections, are governed by KRS

424.260

.

OAG 82-324

.

If the reconstructing or paving of separate county road segments could involve unified specifications and work performance of such nature that bids on the total number of projects as a total package could be obtained, the total work should be let under advertisement for bids, pursuant to KRS

424.260

or KRS Ch. 45A, whichever is applicable to the county; however, if the fiscal court determines upon investigation that lump sum bids upon the total projects cannot be obtained from the road construction trade, then the various road segments should be treated as legally and factually separate and bidding would be necessary for any of the projects if they exceed for a single project the sum of $5,000 (if the Model Procurement Code applies in the county) or exceeds $7,500 (now $20,000) (if KRS

424.260

applies in the county).

OAG 83-316

.

A local public agency that has not adopted the Model Procurement Code is not required to follow competitive bidding procedures for insurance, and may contract with an insurance broker to solicit and receive bids for insurance, although competitive bidding remains preferred. A local public agency that has adopted the Model Procurement Code must follow all applicable provisions in seeking contracts with insurance brokers.

OAG 13-006

.

45A.390.
Cancellation.

An invitation for bid, a request for proposal or other solicitation may be canceled, or all bids or proposals may be rejected, if it is determined in writing that such action is in the best interest of the local public agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 79, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.395.
Determination of responsibility — Right of nondisclosure.

A written determination of responsibility of a bidder or offeror shall be made, based on a reasonable inquiry conducted by the local public agency. The unreasonable failure of a bidder or offeror to promptly supply information upon request may be grounds for a determination of nonresponsibility of such bidder or offeror.

A written determination of responsibility of a bidder or offeror shall not be made until the bidder or offeror provides the local public agency with a sworn statement made under penalty of perjury that he has not knowingly violated any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth and that the award of a contract to the bidder or offeror will not violate any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth. “Knowingly” means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that his conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists.

Except as otherwise provided by law, information furnished by a bidder or offeror pursuant to this section may not be disclosed outside of the local public agency without prior written consent of the bidder or offeror.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 80, effective January 1, 1980; 1992, ch. 288, § 19, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.400.
Prequalification of bidders and offerors.

Suppliers may be prequalified as responsible prospective contractors for particular types of supplies, services, and construction. No supplier shall be prequalified as a responsible prospective contractor until the supplier provides the local public agency with a sworn statement made under penalty of perjury that he has not knowingly violated any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth and that the award of a contract to the supplier will not violate any provision of the campaign finance laws of the Commonwealth. “Knowingly” means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that his conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists. Solicitation mailing lists of potential contractors of such supplies, services, and construction shall include, but shall not be limited to, such prequalified prospective contractors. Prequalification shall not foreclose a written determination:

Between the time of bid opening or receipt of offers in the making of an award that a prequalified prospective contractor is not responsible; or

That a prospective contractor who is not prequalified at the time of bid opening or receipt of offers is responsible.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 81, effective January 1, 1980; 1992, ch. 288, § 20, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.405.
Cost or pricing data.

A contractor shall submit cost or pricing data and shall certify that, to the best of his knowledge and belief, the cost or pricing data submitted was accurate, complete, and current as of a mutually determined specified date prior to the date of:

Pricing of any negotiated contract where the total contract price is expected to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or such lesser amount as may be prescribed by the local public agency; or

Pricing of any change order or contract modification which is expected to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or such lesser amount as may be prescribed by the local public agency.

Any contract, change, or modification thereto under which a certificate is required shall contain a provision that the price to the local public agency, including profit or fee, shall be adjusted to exclude any significant sums by which the local public agency finds that such price was increased because the contractor-furnished cost or pricing data which, as of the date agreed upon between the parties, was inaccurate, incomplete, or not current.

The requirement of this section need not be applied to contracts where the price negotiated is based on adequate price competition, established catalogue or market prices of commercial items sold in substantial quantities to the general public, prices set by law or regulation, or in exceptional cases where it is determined in writing that the requirements of this section may be waived, and the reasons for such waiver are enumerated in the determination.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 82, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.410.
Inspection of contractor’s place of business — Audit of records.

The local public agency may inspect the plant or place of business of a contractor or any subcontractor under any contract awarded or to be awarded by the local public agency.

The local public agency may audit the books and records of any person who has submitted cost or pricing data under KRS

45A.405

, at any time until the period of record retention as set forth in subsection (3) of this section shall have expired. The right to audit hereunder shall only extend to those books and records reasonably connected with cost or pricing data submitted under KRS

45A.420

, and such books and records shall be maintained by the contractor or subcontractor for the period specified in subsection (3) of this section.

The local public agency shall be entitled to audit the books and records of a contractor or any subcontractor under any negotiated contract or subcontract other than a firm fixed-price type contract, provided, however, that this subparagraph shall not limit the right to audit as set forth in subsection (2) of this section. Such books and records shall be maintained by the contractor for a period of five (5) years from the date of final payment under the prime contract and by the subcontractor for a period of five (5) years from the date of final payment under the subcontract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 83, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.415.
Specifications — Items considered equal may be furnished — Proprietary products.

The local public agency shall use specifications which assure the maximum practicable competition to meet the agency’s needs.

Local public agencies shall ensure that every invitation for bids or request for proposals provides that an item equal to that named or described in the specifications may be furnished. The specifications may identify a sole brand in cases where, in the written opinion of the chief procurement officer, documented unique and valid conditions require compatibility, continuity, or conformity with established standards. An item shall be considered equal to the item named or described if, in the opinion of the owner and the design professional responsible for the specifications:

It is at least equal in quality, durability, strength, design, and other criteria deemed appropriate;

It will perform at least equally the function imposed by the general design for the public work being contracted for or the material being purchased; and

It conforms substantially to the detailed requirements for the item in the specifications.

A specification which describes a product which is proprietary to one (1) company may be used only when no other kind of specification is reasonably available to describe requirements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 84, effective January 1, 1980; 2008, ch. 47, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.

45A.420.
Cooperative purchasing — Price agreements with Commonwealth.

Any local public agency may enter into an agreement for cooperative purchasing with any other local public agency. When the contracting local public agency contracts for supplies, services or construction pursuant to KRS

45A.365

,

45A.370

,

45A.375

, or

45A.380

, all other parties to the agreement shall be deemed to have complied with the provisions of those sections.

Nothing in KRS

45A.345

to

45A.990

shall deprive a local public agency from negotiating with vendors for supplies where such supplies are the subject of a price agreement with the Commonwealth of Kentucky provided, however, that no contract executed under this section would authorize a price higher than is contained in the price agreement with the Commonwealth of Kentucky for such specific supplies.

Nothing in KRS

45A.345

to

45A.990

shall deprive a local school district from acquiring supplies outside of price agreements with the Commonwealth of Kentucky if the supplies meet the same specifications as the contract items and the supplies are purchased at a lower price than is contained in the price agreement with the Commonwealth of Kentucky for such specific supplies and the purchase does not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 85, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 14, effective April 9, 1980; 1996, ch. 89, § 3, effective July 15, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A plain reading of subsection (2) of this section shows that the General Assembly intended for this section to be an exception to the usual bidding requirements.

OAG 90-75

.

Construing subsection (2) of this section as an exception to the usual bidding requirements is not contrary to the underlying policies of the code.

OAG 90-75

.

It is likely that the General Assembly intended to give local public agencies the same right to negotiate contracts with vendors offering supplies on the state price agreement list that it previously gave to the Finance and Administration Cabinet when negotiating with vendors offering goods on the general service administration price agreement list.

OAG 90-75

.

Subsection (2) of this section allows a public agency to contract, without bidding, with a vendor who is on the current state contract list but is offering the agency a price lower than on the state price list, provided the local agency has adopted the provisions of KRS

45A.345

through

45A.460

as authorized under KRS

45A.343

.

OAG 90-75

.

The Model Procurement Code allows local public agencies to be flexible in order to take advantage of discounts or cost savings available by means of noncompetitive negotiations if competitive negotiations would not yield greater savings in a given circumstance.

OAG 90-75

.

The plain language of this section supports the view that a local public agency may, without bidding, negotiate with a vendor willing to offer that agency a contract on specific supplies which are the subject of a state price agreement, at a lower cost than on the list.

OAG 90-75

.

The term “negotiating” used in subsection (2) of this section was intended to be the same term of art as defined by KRS 45A.345(11).

OAG 90-75

.

45A.425.
Surplus or excess property.

A local public agency may sell or otherwise dispose of any personal property which is not needed or has become unsuitable for public use, or which would be suitable, consistent with the public interest, for some other use.

A written determination as to need of suitability of any personal property of the local public agency shall be made; and such determination shall fully describe the personal property; its intended use at the time of acquisition; the reasons why it is in the public interest to dispose of the item; and the method of disposition to be used.

Surplus or excess personal property as described in this section may be transferred, with or without compensation, to another governmental agency; or it may be sold at public auction or by sealed bids in accordance with KRS

45A.365

.

In the event that a local public agency receives no bids for surplus or excess personal property, either at public auction or by sealed bid, such property may be disposed of, consistent with the public interest, in any manner deemed appropriate by the local public agency. In such instances, a written description of the property, the method of disposal, and the amount of compensation, if any, shall be made. Any compensation resulting from the disposal of surplus or excess personal property shall be transferred to the general fund of the local public agency.

A local board of education may dispose of its surplus technology in accordance with KRS

160.335

.

As an alternative procedure to that set out in this section, a county may dispose of personal property pursuant to KRS

67.0802

.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section, a city, urban-county government, or consolidated local government that has adopted KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

may dispose of surplus property using the procedures in KRS

82.083

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 86, effective January 1, 1980; 1984, ch. 199, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2008, ch. 14, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 69, § 2, effective March 25, 2019; 2019 ch. 59, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/27/2019). This statute was amended by
2019 Ky. Acts chs. 59 and
69, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

45A.430.
Bid bonds.

Bidder security shall be required for all competitive sealed bidding for construction contracts when the price is estimated by the local public agency to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Bidder’s security shall be a bond provided by a surety company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, or the equivalent in cash, in a form satisfactory to the local public agency. Nothing herein prevents the requirement of such bonds on construction contracts under one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) when the circumstances warrant.

Bidder’s security shall be in an amount equal to at least five percent (5%) of the amount of the bid.

When the invitation for bids requires that bidder security be provided, noncompliance requires that the bid be rejected, provided, however, that the local public agency may set forth by regulation exceptions to this requirement in the event of substantial compliance.

After the bids are opened, they shall be irrevocable for the period specified in the invitation for bids, provided that, if a bidder is permitted to withdraw his bid before award because of a mistake in the bid as allowed by law or regulation, no action shall be had against the bidder or the bidder’s security.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 87, effective January 1, 1980; 2019 ch. 79, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

45A.435.
Contract performance and payment bonds.

When a construction contract is awarded in an amount in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the following bonds shall be furnished to the local public agency, and shall become binding on the parties upon the award of the contract:

A performance bond satisfactory to the local public agency executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, or otherwise supplied, satisfactory to the local public agency, in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the contract price as it may be increased; and

A payment bond satisfactory to the local public agency, executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, or otherwise supplied, satisfactory to the local public agency, for the protection of all persons supplying labor and material to the contractor or his subcontractors for the performance of the work provided for in the contract. The bond shall be in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the original contract price.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the local public agency to require a performance bond or other security in addition to those bonds, or in circumstances other than specified in subsection (1) of this section, including, but not limited to, bonds for the payment of taxes and unemployment insurance premiums.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 88, effective January 1, 1980; 2019 ch. 79, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cited:

Acuity, A Mutual Ins. Co. v. Planters Bank, Inc., 362 F. Supp. 2d 885, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 5293 (

Ky. 2005

).

45A.440.
Bond forms, filings, and copies.

The local public agency may promulgate by regulation the form of the bonds required by KRS

45A.430

and

45A.435

, or it may adopt the form established by the state under KRS

45A.180

to

45A.200

.

The local public agency shall furnish a certified copy of a bond to any person who requests such and pays the reasonable fee for that copy. The copy shall be prima facie evidence of the contents, execution, and delivery of the original.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 89, effective January 1, 1980; 1992, ch. 55, § 10, effective July 14, 1992.

45A.445.
Definitions for terms used in KRS 45A.445 to 45A.460.

As used in KRS

45A.445

to

45A.460

, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Conspicuously” shall mean written in such special or distinctive format, print, or manner that a reasonable person against whom it is to operate ought to have noticed it.

“Confidential information” shall mean any information which is available to an employee only because of his status as an employee of the local public agency and is not a matter of public knowledge or available to the public on request.

“Debarment” shall mean the disqualification of a person to receive invitations for bids or requests for proposals, or the award of a contract by the local public agency for a specified period of time.

“Financial interest” shall mean:

Ownership of any interest or involvement in any relationship from which, or as a result of which, a person has, within the past three (3) years, received or is presently or in the future entitled to receive more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per year, or its equivalent; or

Ownership of more than a ten percent (10%) interest in any business; or

Holding a position in a business such as an officer, director, trustee, partner, employee, or the like, or holding any position of management.

“Gratuity” shall mean a payment, loan, subscription, advance, deposit of money, services, or anything of more than fifty dollars ($50) value, present or promised, unless consideration of substantially equal or greater value is received.

“Immediate family” shall mean a spouse, children, grandchildren, parents, grandparents, brothers and sisters, and such other relatives as designated by the local public agency.

“Official responsibility” shall mean direct administrative or operating authority, whether intermediate or final, either exercisable alone or with others, either personally or through subordinates, to approve, disapprove, or otherwise direct local public agency actions.

“Suspension” shall mean the disqualification of any person to receive invitations for bids or requests for proposals, or to be awarded a contract by a local public agency for a temporary period, pending the completion of an investigation and any legal proceedings that may ensue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 90, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 15, effective April 9, 1980.

45A.450.
Statement of public policy.

Public employment is a public trust.

It is the policy and purpose of KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

to promote and balance the object of protecting government integrity and of facilitating the recruitment and retention of personnel needed by local public agencies by prescribing essential restrictions against conflict of interest without creating unnecessary barriers to public service and by facilitating development of fair and competitive access to local public agency purchasing by responsible contractors.

Employees must discharge their duties and responsibilities fairly and impartially. They should also maintain a standard of conduct that will inspire public confidence in the integrity of the government of all local public agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 91, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.455.
Conflict of interest — Gratuities and kickbacks — Use of confidential information.

It shall be a breach of ethical standards for any employee with procurement authority to participate directly in any proceeding or application; request for ruling or other determination; claim or controversy; or other particular matter pertaining to any contract, or subcontract, and any solicitation or proposal therefor, in which to his knowledge:

He, or any member of his immediate family has a financial interest therein; or

A business or organization in which he or any member of his immediate family has a financial interest as an officer, director, trustee, partner, or employee, is a party; or

Any other person, business, or organization with whom he or any member of his immediate family is negotiating or has an arrangement concerning prospective employment is a party. Direct or indirect participation shall include but not be limited to involvement through decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, preparation of any part of a purchase request, influencing the content of any specification or purchase standard, rendering of advice, investigation, auditing, or in any other advisory capacity.

It shall be a breach of ethical standards for any person to offer, give, or agree to give any employee or former employee, or for any employee or former employee to solicit, demand, accept, or agree to accept from another person, a gratuity or an offer of employment, in connection with any decision, approval, disapproval, recommendation, preparation of any part of a purchase request, influencing the content of any specification or purchase standard, rendering of advice, investigation, auditing, or in any other advisory capacity in any proceeding or application, request for ruling or other determination, claim or controversy, or other particular matter, pertaining to any contract or subcontract and any solicitation or proposal therefor.

It is a breach of ethical standards for any payment, gratuity, or offer of employment to be made by or on behalf of a subcontractor under a contract to the prime contractor or higher tier subcontractor or any person associated therewith, as an inducement for the award of a subcontract or order.

The prohibition against conflicts of interest and gratuities and kickbacks shall be conspicuously set forth in every local public agency written contract and solicitation therefor.

It shall be a breach of ethical standards for any public employee or former employee knowingly to use confidential information for his actual or anticipated personal gain, or the actual or anticipated personal gain of any other person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 92, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 16, effective April 9, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Subsection (1) of this section prohibits involvement in the procurement function by a school employee relative to any item sold to the school by a supply firm with which an immediate family member is involved, presently or prospectively, but this prohibition only acts to restrain the particular employee, not the entire school district employing him; thus, if the employee is not so involved, the district is free to purchase from such a firm.

OAG 80-32

.

Subsection (1) of this section prohibits a fire department member’s fencing firm from contracting with the city, since he is an employee of the city, regardless of the fact that the contract may be awarded on a bid basis.

OAG 80-133

.

This section had no application in 1980 to a rock sale to a county, which took place in 1976, by the father of an individual who became the county attorney in 1978, where the county attorney had no direct or indirect financial interest in that transaction within the three years prior to the effective date, January 1, 1980, of this conflict of interest statute.

OAG 80-176

.

The chairperson of the city board of trustees would have to refrain from participating and voting on the granting of a rental contract for the use of a recreational room in a municipal building entered into with the daughter or sister of the chairperson, because such action would be considered as against public policy; also, the chairperson could not participate directly or indirectly in the granting of such a contract by the city involving a member of his immediate family in view of this section pertaining to the Model Procurement Act.

OAG 80-198

.

It is an impermissible conflict of interest and against public policy for a trustee of a sixth-class city to participate as a member of the board in the awarding of the city’s insurance contract to his son, an insurance agent, even though his son is the only insurance agent in the city and despite the fact that the contract was awarded at the same rate as earlier contracts had been awarded before the trustee took office.

OAG 80-293

.

Public policy dictates that the deputy county judge/executive must avoid participating, directly or indirectly, in any proceeding involving a county contract with her spouse.

OAG 80-296

.

The Model Procurement Code would not prohibit an assistant school principal from submitting a competitive bid to the school board for services as a professional auctioneer.

OAG 80-605

.

Where county police officer also owned a cleaning business which was a Kentucky corporation, there would be no statutory conflict of interest involved if the corporation were to submit a sealed bid on the cleaning of county and city buildings, assuming that the county fiscal court had adopted KRS

45A.345

through

45A.460

and that the county police officer had no procurement authority for the county.

OAG 83-28

.

Since a city fireman lacks procurement authority, he or a member of his immediate family could contract with the city without violating this section.

OAG 83-96

.

Where husband was a city fireman and wife was sole owner of a small printing shop, which had been doing printing business for the city, there was no legal objection, based on conflict of interest statutes, to the wife continuing to contract with the city for printing services.

OAG 83-96

.